Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.080

Educator conditional scholarship account.

(1) The educator conditional scholarship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for moneys used for program administration.

(2) The office shall deposit in the account all moneys received for the educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs under this chapter. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs under this chapter, private contributions to the programs, and receipts from participant repayments from the programs. Beginning July 1, 2004, the office shall also deposit into the account: (a) All funds from the institution of higher education loan account that are traceable to any conditional scholarship program for teachers or prospective teachers established by the legislature before June 10, 2004; and (b) all amounts repaid by participants under any such program.

(3) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this chapter.

(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the authorization of the office.

[ 2019 c 295 s 224; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 182; 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 917; 2007 c 396 s 9; 2004 c 58 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.